Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0249

"Gambling premises."

"Gambling premises," as used in this chapter, means any building, room, enclosure, vehicle, vessel or other place used or intended to be used for professional gambling. In the application of this definition, any place where a gambling device is found shall be presumed to be intended to be used for professional gambling.

[ 1987 c 4 s 13. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(12).]